Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.393

United States vocational education account—Warrants to be paid from general fund.

From and after the first day of August, 1957, all warrants drawn on the United States vocational education account in the general fund and not presented for payment shall be paid from the general fund, and it shall be the duty of the state treasurer and he or she is hereby directed to pay such warrants when presented from the general fund.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5155; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.393. Prior: 1957 c 226 s 4.]